Utah statutes.
76-10-1904.   Money laundering -- Penalty.

(1)  A person who violates Subsection 76-10-1903(1)(a), (b), or (c) is guilty of a second degree felony.

(2)  A person who violates Subsection 76-10-1903(1)(d) is guilty of a third degree felony.

